District of Columbia statutes.
42-2301

Definitions.

For the purposes of this chapter, the term:

(1)

“Credit line deed of trust” means any deed of trust in which title to real property located in the District of Columbia is conveyed, transferred, encumbered, or pledged to secure repayment of money that is loaned in the form of periodic advances by the noteholder named in the credit line deed of trust.

(2)

“Real property” has the meaning set forth in § 47-802(1).

(3)

“Single family residential property” shall have the same meaning as the term has in § 47-803(6).

Jan. 28, 1988, D.C. Law 7-67, § 2, 34 DCR 7441
Mar. 11, 1992, D.C. Law 9-72, § 2(a), 39 DCR 20

History

1981 Ed., § 45-2901.

Prior Codifications